work/esperanto.aff
flag *T:	# verboj (kun la pasivo); ekz-e fari/IT
    A	>	-A,I
    A	>	S
    A	>	-A,IS
    A	>	-A,OS
    A	>	-A,US
    A	>	-A,U	   # kiel: cii, ciado
    A	>	NTA
    A	>	NTAJ
    A	>	NTAJN
    A	>	NTAN
    A	>	NTE
    A	>	NT^'
    A	>	NTO
    A	>	NTOJ
    A	>	NTOJN
    A	>	NTON
    A	>	TA
    A	>	TAJ
    A	>	TAJN
    A	>	TAN
    A	>	TE
    A	>	T^'
    A	>	TO
    A	>	TOJ
    A	>	TOJN
    A	>	TON
    A	>	DO
    A	>	DON

    I	>	-I,ADA
    I	>	-I,ADAJ
    I	>	-I,ADAJN
    I	>	-I,ADAN
    I	>	-I,ADE
    I	>	-I,AD^'
    I	>	-I,ADO
    I	>	-I,ADOJ
    I	>	-I,ADOJN
    I	>	-I,ADON
    I >	-I,ADI
    I >	-I,ADAS
    I >	-I,ADIS
    I >	-I,ADOS
    I >	-I,ADUS
    I >	-I,ADU
 I >	-I,AS
    I >	S
    I >	-I,OS
    I >	-I,US
    I	>	-I,U
    I	>	NTA
    I	>	NTAJ
    I	>	NTAJN
    I	>	NTAN
    I	>	NTE
    I	>	NT^'
    I	>	NTO
    I	>	NTOJ
    I	>	NTOJN
    I	>	NTON
    I	>	-I,ANTA
    I	>	-I,ANTAJ
    I	>	-I,ANTAJN
    I	>	-I,ANTAN
    I	>	-I,ANTE
    I	>	-I,ANT^'
    I	>	-I,ANTO
    I	>	-I,ANTOJ
    I	>	-I,ANTOJN
    I	>	-I,ANTON
    I	>	-I,ONTA
    I	>	-I,ONTAJ
    I	>	-I,ONTAJN
    I	>	-I,ONTAN
    I	>	-I,ONTE
    I	>	-I,ONT^'
    I	>	-I,ONTO
    I	>	-I,ONTOJ
    I	>	-I,ONTOJN
    I	>	-I,ONTON
   I	>	NTINA
    I	>	NTINAJ
    I	>	NTINAJN
    I	>	NTINAN
    I	>	NTIN^'
    I	>	NTINO
    I	>	NTINOJ
    I	>	NTINOJN
    I	>	NTINON
    I	>	-I,ANTINA
    I	>	-I,ANTINAJ
    I	>	-I,ANTINAJN
    I	>	-I,ANTINAN
    I	>	-I,ANTIN^'
    I	>	-I,ANTINO
    I	>	-I,ANTINOJ
    I	>	-I,ANTINOJN
    I	>	-I,ANTINON
    I	>	-I,ONTINA
    I	>	-I,ONTINAJ
    I	>	-I,ONTINAJN
    I	>	-I,ONTINAN
    I	>	-I,ONTIN^'
    I	>	-I,ONTINO
    I	>	-I,ONTINOJ
    I	>	-I,ONTINOJN
    I	>	-I,ONTINON
#    Adj(I,-I,EM)	    # petolema
    U	>	-U,ADA
    U	>	-U,ADAJ
    U	>	-U,ADAJN
    U	>	-U,ADAN
    U	>	-U,ADE
    U	>	-U,AD^'
    U	>	-U,ADO
    U	>	-U,ADOJ
    U	>	-U,ADOJN
    U	>	-U,ADON
    U >	-U,ADI
    U >	-U,ADAS
    U >	-U,ADIS
    U >	-U,ADOS
    U >	-U,ADUS
    U >	-U,ADU
    U >	-U,AS
    U >	-U,IS
    U >	-U,OS
    U >	S
    U	>	-U,I
    U	>	-U,INTA
    U	>	-U,INTAJ
    U	>	-U,INTAJN
    U	>	-U,INTAN
    U	>	-U,INTE
    U	>	-U,INT^'
    U	>	-U,INTO
    U	>	-U,INTOJ
    U	>	-U,INTOJN
    U	>	-U,INTON
    U	>	-U,ANTA
    U	>	-U,ANTAJ
    U	>	-U,ANTAJN
    U	>	-U,ANTAN
    U	>	-U,ANTE
    U	>	-U,ANT^'
    U	>	-U,ANTO
    U	>	-U,ANTOJ
    U	>	-U,ANTOJN
    U	>	-U,ANTON
    U	>	-U,ONTA
    U	>	-U,ONTAJ
    U	>	-U,ONTAJN
    U	>	-U,ONTAN
    U	>	-U,ONTE
    U	>	-U,ONT^'
    U	>	-U,ONTO
    U	>	-U,ONTOJ
    U	>	-U,ONTOJN
    U	>	-U,ONTON
   U	>	-U,INTINA
    U	>	-U,INTINAJ
    U	>	-U,INTINAJN
    U	>	-U,INTINAN
    U	>	-U,INTIN^'
    U	>	-U,INTINO
    U	>	-U,INTINOJ
    U	>	-U,INTINOJN
    U	>	-U,INTINON
    U	>	-U,ANTINA
    U	>	-U,ANTINAJ
    U	>	-U,ANTINAJN
    U	>	-U,ANTINAN
    U	>	-U,ANTIN^'
    U	>	-U,ANTINO
    U	>	-U,ANTINOJ
    U	>	-U,ANTINOJN
    U	>	-U,ANTINON
    U	>	-U,ONTINA
    U	>	-U,ONTINAJ
    U	>	-U,ONTINAJN
    U	>	-U,ONTINAN
    U	>	-U,ONTIN^'
    U	>	-U,ONTINO
    U	>	-U,ONTINOJ
    U	>	-U,ONTINOJN
    U	>	-U,ONTINON
    I	>	-I,O	    #substantivo ununombra: dormi -> dormo
    I	>	-I,^'
    I	>	-I,ON
    U	>	-U,O
    U	>	-U,^'
    U	>	-U,ON
    I	>	TA
    I	>	TAJ
    I	>	TAJN
    I	>	TAN
    I	>	TE
    I	>	T^'
    I	>	TO
    I	>	TOJ
    I	>	TOJN
    I	>	TON
    I	>	-I,ATA
    I	>	-I,ATAJ
    I	>	-I,ATAJN
    I	>	-I,ATAN
    I	>	-I,ATE
    I	>	-I,AT^'
    I	>	-I,ATO
    I	>	-I,ATOJ
    I	>	-I,ATOJN
    I	>	-I,ATON
    I	>	-I,OTA
    I	>	-I,OTAJ
    I	>	-I,OTAJN
    I	>	-I,OTAN
    I	>	-I,OTE
    I	>	-I,OT^'
    I	>	-I,OTO
    I	>	-I,OTOJ
    I	>	-I,OTOJN
    I	>	-I,OTON
    I >	-I,EBLAS
    I >	-I,EBLIS
    I >	-I,EBLOS
    I >	-I,EBLUS
    I	>	-I,EBLA
    I	>	-I,EBLAJ
    I	>	-I,EBLAJN
    I	>	-I,EBLAN
    I	>	-I,EBLE
    I	>	-I,EBL^'
    I	>	-I,EBLO
    I	>	-I,EBLOJ
    I	>	-I,EBLOJN
    I	>	-I,EBLON

    I	>	-I,EBLEC^'
    I	>	-I,EBLECO
    I	>	-I,EBLECOJ
    I	>	-I,EBLECOJN
    I	>	-I,EBLECON
    I >	-I,ENDAS
    I >	-I,ENDIS
    I >	-I,ENDOS
    I >	-I,ENDUS
    I	>	-I,ENDA
    I	>	-I,ENDAJ
    I	>	-I,ENDAJN
    I	>	-I,ENDAN
    I	>	-I,ENDE
    I	>	-I,END^'
    I	>	-I,ENDO
    I	>	-I,ENDOJ
    I	>	-I,ENDOJN
    I	>	-I,ENDON		    # pasivo:
    U	>	-U,ITA
    U	>	-U,ITAJ
    U	>	-U,ITAJN
    U	>	-U,ITAN
    U	>	-U,ITE
    U	>	-U,IT^'
    U	>	-U,ITO
    U	>	-U,ITOJ
    U	>	-U,ITOJN
    U	>	-U,ITON
    U	>	-U,ATA
    U	>	-U,ATAJ
    U	>	-U,ATAJN
    U	>	-U,ATAN
    U	>	-U,ATE
    U	>	-U,AT^'
    U	>	-U,ATO
    U	>	-U,ATOJ
    U	>	-U,ATOJN
    U	>	-U,ATON
    U	>	-U,OTA
    U	>	-U,OTAJ
    U	>	-U,OTAJN
    U	>	-U,OTAN
    U	>	-U,OTE
    U	>	-U,OT^'
    U	>	-U,OTO
    U	>	-U,OTOJ
    U	>	-U,OTOJN
    U	>	-U,OTON
    U >	-U,EBLAS
    U >	-U,EBLIS
    U >	-U,EBLOS
    U >	-U,EBLUS
    U	>	-U,EBLA
    U	>	-U,EBLAJ
    U	>	-U,EBLAJN
    U	>	-U,EBLAN
    U	>	-U,EBLE
    U	>	-U,EBL^'
    U	>	-U,EBLO
    U	>	-U,EBLOJ
    U	>	-U,EBLOJN
    U	>	-U,EBLON

    U	>	-U,EBLEC^'
    U	>	-U,EBLECO
    U	>	-U,EBLECOJ
    U	>	-U,EBLECOJN
    U	>	-U,EBLECON
    U >	-U,ENDAS
    U >	-U,ENDIS
    U >	-U,ENDOS
    U >	-U,ENDUS
    U	>	-U,ENDA
    U	>	-U,ENDAJ
    U	>	-U,ENDAJN
    U	>	-U,ENDAN
    U	>	-U,ENDE
    U	>	-U,END^'
    U	>	-U,ENDO
    U	>	-U,ENDOJ
    U	>	-U,ENDOJN
    U	>	-U,ENDON		    # pasivo:

flag *U:
    A	>	-A,ULA
    A	>	-A,ULAJ
    A	>	-A,ULAJN
    A	>	-A,ULAN
    A	>	-A,ULE
    A	>	-A,UL^'
    A	>	-A,ULO
    A	>	-A,ULOJ
    A	>	-A,ULOJN
    A	>	-A,ULON
    A	>	-A,ULINA
    A	>	-A,ULINAJ
    A	>	-A,ULINAJN
    A	>	-A,ULINAN
    A	>	-A,ULINE
    A	>	-A,ULIN^'
    A	>	-A,ULINO
    A	>	-A,ULINOJ
    A	>	-A,ULINOJN
    A	>	-A,ULINON
    O	>	-O,ULA
    O	>	-O,ULAJ
    O	>	-O,ULAJN
    O	>	-O,ULAN
    O	>	-O,ULE
    O	>	-O,UL^'
    O	>	-O,ULO
    O	>	-O,ULOJ
    O	>	-O,ULOJN
    O	>	-O,ULON
    O	>	-O,ULINA
    O	>	-O,ULINAJ
    O	>	-O,ULINAJN
    O	>	-O,ULINAN
    O	>	-O,ULINE
    O	>	-O,ULIN^'
    O	>	-O,ULINO
    O	>	-O,ULINOJ
    O	>	-O,ULINOJN
    O	>	-O,ULINON
    I	>	-I,ULA
    I	>	-I,ULAJ
    I	>	-I,ULAJN
    I	>	-I,ULAN
    I	>	-I,ULE
    I	>	-I,UL^'
    I	>	-I,ULO
    I	>	-I,ULOJ
    I	>	-I,ULOJN
    I	>	-I,ULON
    I	>	-I,ULINA
    I	>	-I,ULINAJ
    I	>	-I,ULINAJN
    I	>	-I,ULINAN
    I	>	-I,ULINE
    I	>	-I,ULIN^'
    I	>	-I,ULINO
    I	>	-I,ULINOJ
    I	>	-I,ULINOJN
    I	>	-I,ULINON

flag *V:	# verboj (sen pasivo); ekz-e esti/V
    A	>	-A,I
    A	>	S
    A	>	-A,IS
    A	>	-A,OS
    A	>	-A,US
    A	>	-A,U	   # noktis, grandas
#    nome(A,,NT)
    A S	>	-AS,IS	   # tempas > tempis
    A S	>	-AS,OS
    A S	>	-AS,U      # kohera => koheru
    A S	>	-AS,US
    A S	>	-AS,I	   # objektivas > objektivi
    O	>	-O,ADA
    O	>	-O,ADAJ
    O	>	-O,ADAJN
    O	>	-O,ADAN
    O	>	-O,ADE
    O	>	-O,AD^'
    O	>	-O,ADO
    O	>	-O,ADOJ
    O	>	-O,ADOJN
    O	>	-O,ADON	   # pontifiko > pontifikado

    I	>	-I,ADA
    I	>	-I,ADAJ
    I	>	-I,ADAJN
    I	>	-I,ADAN
    I	>	-I,ADE
    I	>	-I,AD^'
    I	>	-I,ADO
    I	>	-I,ADOJ
    I	>	-I,ADOJN
    I	>	-I,ADON
    I >	-I,ADI
    I >	-I,ADAS
    I >	-I,ADIS
    I >	-I,ADOS
    I >	-I,ADUS
    I >	-I,ADU
 I >	-I,AS
    I >	S
    I >	-I,OS
    I >	-I,US
    I	>	-I,U
    I	>	NTA
    I	>	NTAJ
    I	>	NTAJN
    I	>	NTAN
    I	>	NTE
    I	>	NT^'
    I	>	NTO
    I	>	NTOJ
    I	>	NTOJN
    I	>	NTON
    I	>	-I,ANTA
    I	>	-I,ANTAJ
    I	>	-I,ANTAJN
    I	>	-I,ANTAN
    I	>	-I,ANTE
    I	>	-I,ANT^'
    I	>	-I,ANTO
    I	>	-I,ANTOJ
    I	>	-I,ANTOJN
    I	>	-I,ANTON
    I	>	-I,ONTA
    I	>	-I,ONTAJ
    I	>	-I,ONTAJN
    I	>	-I,ONTAN
    I	>	-I,ONTE
    I	>	-I,ONT^'
    I	>	-I,ONTO
    I	>	-I,ONTOJ
    I	>	-I,ONTOJN
    I	>	-I,ONTON
   I	>	NTINA
    I	>	NTINAJ
    I	>	NTINAJN
    I	>	NTINAN
    I	>	NTIN^'
    I	>	NTINO
    I	>	NTINOJ
    I	>	NTINOJN
    I	>	NTINON
    I	>	-I,ANTINA
    I	>	-I,ANTINAJ
    I	>	-I,ANTINAJN
    I	>	-I,ANTINAN
    I	>	-I,ANTIN^'
    I	>	-I,ANTINO
    I	>	-I,ANTINOJ
    I	>	-I,ANTINOJN
    I	>	-I,ANTINON
    I	>	-I,ONTINA
    I	>	-I,ONTINAJ
    I	>	-I,ONTINAJN
    I	>	-I,ONTINAN
    I	>	-I,ONTIN^'
    I	>	-I,ONTINO
    I	>	-I,ONTINOJ
    I	>	-I,ONTINOJN
    I	>	-I,ONTINON
#    Adj(I,-I,EM)	    # petolema
    U	>	-U,ADA
    U	>	-U,ADAJ
    U	>	-U,ADAJN
    U	>	-U,ADAN
    U	>	-U,ADE
    U	>	-U,AD^'
    U	>	-U,ADO
    U	>	-U,ADOJ
    U	>	-U,ADOJN
    U	>	-U,ADON
    U >	-U,ADI
    U >	-U,ADAS
    U >	-U,ADIS
    U >	-U,ADOS
    U >	-U,ADUS
    U >	-U,ADU
    U >	-U,AS
    U >	-U,IS
    U >	-U,OS
    U >	S
    U	>	-U,I
    U	>	-U,INTA
    U	>	-U,INTAJ
    U	>	-U,INTAJN
    U	>	-U,INTAN
    U	>	-U,INTE
    U	>	-U,INT^'
    U	>	-U,INTO
    U	>	-U,INTOJ
    U	>	-U,INTOJN
    U	>	-U,INTON
    U	>	-U,ANTA
    U	>	-U,ANTAJ
    U	>	-U,ANTAJN
    U	>	-U,ANTAN
    U	>	-U,ANTE
    U	>	-U,ANT^'
    U	>	-U,ANTO
    U	>	-U,ANTOJ
    U	>	-U,ANTOJN
    U	>	-U,ANTON
    U	>	-U,ONTA
    U	>	-U,ONTAJ
    U	>	-U,ONTAJN
    U	>	-U,ONTAN
    U	>	-U,ONTE
    U	>	-U,ONT^'
    U	>	-U,ONTO
    U	>	-U,ONTOJ
    U	>	-U,ONTOJN
    U	>	-U,ONTON
   U	>	-U,INTINA
    U	>	-U,INTINAJ
    U	>	-U,INTINAJN
    U	>	-U,INTINAN
    U	>	-U,INTIN^'
    U	>	-U,INTINO
    U	>	-U,INTINOJ
    U	>	-U,INTINOJN
    U	>	-U,INTINON
    U	>	-U,ANTINA
    U	>	-U,ANTINAJ
    U	>	-U,ANTINAJN
    U	>	-U,ANTINAN
    U	>	-U,ANTIN^'
    U	>	-U,ANTINO
    U	>	-U,ANTINOJ
    U	>	-U,ANTINOJN
    U	>	-U,ANTINON
    U	>	-U,ONTINA
    U	>	-U,ONTINAJ
    U	>	-U,ONTINAJN
    U	>	-U,ONTINAN
    U	>	-U,ONTIN^'
    U	>	-U,ONTINO
    U	>	-U,ONTINOJ
    U	>	-U,ONTINOJN
    U	>	-U,ONTINON
    I	>	-I,O	    #substantivo ununombra: dormi -> dormo
    I	>	-I,^'
    I	>	-I,ON
    U	>	-U,O
    U	>	-U,^'
    U	>	-U,ON
    
#    Adj(I,,ND)		    # ridinda
#    nomo(I,,NDA^J)	    # ridindajxo
#    ifdef({LOZE},{subst(I,,NDEC)})

flag *W:
    O	>	-O,ANA
    O	>	-O,ANAJ
    O	>	-O,ANAJN
    O	>	-O,ANAN
    O	>	-O,ANE
    O	>	-O,AN^'
    O	>	-O,ANO
    O	>	-O,ANOJ
    O	>	-O,ANOJN
    O	>	-O,ANON
    O	>	-O,ANINA
    O	>	-O,ANINAJ
    O	>	-O,ANINAJN
    O	>	-O,ANINAN
    O	>	-O,ANINE
    O	>	-O,ANIN^'
    O	>	-O,ANINO
    O	>	-O,ANINOJ
    O	>	-O,ANINOJN
    O	>	-O,ANINON
    A	>	NA
    A	>	NAJ
    A	>	NAJN
    A	>	NAN
    A	>	NE
    A	>	N^'
    A	>	NO
    A	>	NOJ
    A	>	NOJN
    A	>	NON
    A	>	NINA
    A	>	NINAJ
    A	>	NINAJN
    A	>	NINAN
    A	>	NINE
    A	>	NIN^'
    A	>	NINO
    A	>	NINOJ
    A	>	NINOJN
    A	>	NINON
    I	>	-I,ANA
    I	>	-I,ANAJ
    I	>	-I,ANAJN
    I	>	-I,ANAN
    I	>	-I,ANE
    I	>	-I,AN^'
    I	>	-I,ANO
    I	>	-I,ANOJ
    I	>	-I,ANOJN
    I	>	-I,ANON
    I	>	-I,ANINA
    I	>	-I,ANINAJ
    I	>	-I,ANINAJN
    I	>	-I,ANINAN
    I	>	-I,ANINE
    I	>	-I,ANIN^'
    I	>	-I,ANINO
    I	>	-I,ANINOJ
    I	>	-I,ANINOJN
    I	>	-I,ANINON
    O N	>	-ON,ANA
    O N	>	-ON,ANAJ
    O N	>	-ON,ANAJN
    O N	>	-ON,ANAN
    O N	>	-ON,ANE
    O N	>	-ON,AN^'
    O N	>	-ON,ANO
    O N	>	-ON,ANOJ
    O N	>	-ON,ANOJN
    O N	>	-ON,ANON     # rusoismon/AXW, sen "rusoismoj"
    O N	>	-ON,ANINA
    O N	>	-ON,ANINAJ
    O N	>	-ON,ANINAJN
    O N	>	-ON,ANINAN
    O N	>	-ON,ANINE
    O N	>	-ON,ANIN^'
    O N	>	-ON,ANINO
    O N	>	-ON,ANINOJ
    O N	>	-ON,ANINOJN
    O N	>	-ON,ANINON
